Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1

General Provisions

57-3-101. Title definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Alcoholic beverage” or “beverage” means and includes alcohol, spirits, liquor, wine, high alcohol content beer, and every liquid containing alcohol, spirits, wine, and high alcohol content beer and capable of being consumed by a human being, other than patent medicine or beer, as defined in § 57-5-101. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this title, except for beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b), “alcoholic beverage” or “beverage” also includes any liquid product containing distilled alcohol capable of being consumed by a human being, manufactured or made with distilled alcohol, regardless of alcohol content. Liquid products intended for beverage purposes containing alcohol that do not meet the definition of beer under § 57-5-101(b) shall also be alcoholic beverages. Notwithstanding this subdivision (a)(1)(A), products or beverages containing less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) alcohol by volume, other than wine as defined in this section, shall not be considered to be alcoholic beverages, and shall not be subject to regulation or taxation pursuant to chapters 1-6 and 9 of this title.

Notwithstanding this definition, ethanol produced in a facility whose production process is primarily a wet milling process in bulk and sold and transported in bulk lots of five thousand gallons (5,000 gals.) or more and not packaged for retail sale by the holder of a valid alcohol fuels permit or a valid distilled spirits permit:

For export to another country;

To a domestic manufacturer, distiller, vintner, or rectifier who is a duly licensed alcohol beverage or liquor manufacturer in this or some other state; or

To a manufacturer who uses the ethanol to create a product which is incapable of human consumption or contains less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) alcohol by volume;

shall not be considered to be an alcoholic beverage and shall not be subject to regulation or taxation pursuant to chapters 1-6 and 9 of this title;

“Commission” means the alcoholic beverage commission, except as otherwise provided;

“Distiller” means any person who owns, occupies, carries on, works, conducts or operates any distillery either personally or by an agent;

“Distillery” means and includes any place or premises wherein any liquors are manufactured for sale;

“Federal license” does not mean tax receipt or permit;

“Gallon” or “gallons” means a wine gallon or wine gallons, of one hundred and twenty-eight ounces (128 oz.);

“Gift” means and includes the unauthorized distribution of alcoholic beverages by a licensee for which no payment is expected or received; provided, however, that it does not include any such transaction between a licensee and its employee or employees in the normal course of employment or depletions from a licensee's inventory related to routine business or marketing purposes where all applicable taxes have been paid;

“High alcohol content beer” means an alcoholic beverage which is beer, ale or other malt beverage having an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight and not more than twenty percent (20%) by weight, except wine as defined in § 57-3-101, that is brewed, regulated, distributed or sold pursuant to chapter 3 of this title; provided, that no more than forty-nine percent (49%) of the overall alcoholic content of such beverage may be derived from the addition of flavors and other nonbeverage ingredients containing alcohol;

“Importer” means any person or entity holding a non-manufacturer non-resident seller's permit pursuant to § 57-3-602(c) or any entity causing alcoholic beverages to be delivered or shipped into this state holding an importer's basic permit from the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States department of the treasury;

“License” means the license issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Licensee” means any person to whom such license has been issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Manufacture” means and includes brewing high alcohol content beer, distilling, rectifying and operating a winery;

“Manufacturer” means and includes a brewer of high alcohol content beer, distiller, vintner and rectifier;

“Municipality” means an incorporated town or city having a population of nine hundred twenty-five (925) persons or over by the federal census of 1950 or any subsequent federal census; provided, however, that when any incorporated town or city by ordinance authorizes a census to be taken of such incorporated town or city and shall furnish to the commission a certified copy of the census containing the name, address, age and sex of each person enumerated therein, and if the census shall show that the incorporated town or city has a population of nine hundred twenty-five (925) persons or over, the commission, upon verification of the census, may declare such incorporated town or city to be a “municipality” for all intents and purposes of this chapter;

“Pint” means one eighth (1/8) of a wine gallon;

“Quart” means one fourth (¼) of a wine gallon;

“Rectifier” means and includes any person who rectifies, purifies or refines distilled spirits or wines by any process other than as provided for on distillery premises, and every person who, without rectifying, purifying or refining distilled spirits, shall, by mixing such spirits, wine or other liquor with any material, manufacture any imitation of, or compounds liquors for sale under the name of, whiskey, brandy, gin, rum, wine, spirits, cordials, bitters or any other name;

“Retail food store wine license” means a license for the sale of wine at retail in a retail food store as defined in part 8 of this chapter;

“Retailer” means any person who sells at retail any beverage for the sale of which a license is required under this chapter;

“Retail sale” or “sale at retail” means a sale to a consumer or to any person for any purpose other than for resale; provided, however, that it does not include any transaction between a licensee and its employee or employees in the normal course of employment for which no payment is expected or received or depletions from a licensee's inventory related to routine business or marketing purposes where all applicable taxes have been paid;

“Vintner” means any person who owns, occupies, carries on, works, conducts or operates any winery, either personally or by an agent;

“Wholesaler” means any person who sells at wholesale any beverage for the sale of which a license is required under this chapter;

“Wholesale sale” or “sale at wholesale” means a sale to any person for purposes of resale, except that sales by a person licensed under § 57-3-204 to a charitable, nonprofit, or political organization possessing a valid special occasion license for resale by such organizations pursuant to their special occasion license shall not be construed as such a sale;

“Wine” means the product of the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of fresh, sound, ripe grapes, with the usual cellar treatment and necessary additions to correct defects due to climatic, saccharine and seasonal conditions, including champagne, sparkling and fortified wine of an alcoholic content not to exceed twenty-one percent (21%) by volume. No other product shall be called “wine” unless designated by appropriate prefixes descriptive of the fruit or other product from which the same was predominantly produced, or an artificial or imitation wine; and

“Winery” means and includes any place or premises wherein wines are manufactured from any fruit or brandies distilled as the by-product of wine or other fruit or cordials compounded, and also includes a winery for the manufacture of wine.

Words importing the masculine gender include the feminine and the neuter, and the singular includes the plural.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 3, 4, 13; 1949, ch. 284, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.4, 6648.19 (Williams, §§ 6648.6, 6648.7, 6648.16); Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 2A; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 11; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-106; Acts 1981, ch. 404, § 4; 1982, ch. 877, § 5; 1983, ch. 229, § 4; 1986, ch. 516, § 1; 1989, ch. 325, § 1; 1991, ch. 58, § 1; 1997, ch. 155, § 2; 2005, ch. 298, § 1; 2009, ch. 395, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 448, §§ 7-11; 2014, ch. 554, § 6; 2014, ch. 767, § 3; 2014, ch. 861, § 1; 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This chapter, to the extent that the provisions hereof are in direct conflict with the provisions of §§12-2-201 —12-2-204, as to the authority vested by such sections in the commissioner of general services for the advertising and sale of contraband intoxicating beverages and motor vehicles, is repealed by Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 5.

For tables of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 2, 5-9, 11, 12, 16, 23.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

The Wine Is In the Mail: The Twenty-First Amendment and State Laws Against the Direct Shipment of Alcoholic Beverages, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2495 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to foodstuff products, OAG 90-31, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (3/7/90).

Hard cider, OAG 94-75, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (7/8/94).

Because a county previously approved liquor-by-the-drink sales through a county-wide referendum, this referendum made such sales legal within a city meeting the definition of a municipality under T.C.A. §57-3-101; further, the exclusion of certain municipalities from the effects of a county-wide referendum as described in T.C.A. §57-3-106(g)(1) did not apply to the city because its population is, and always has been, smaller than the least populous county according to the 1960 and subsequent censuses, OAG 02-092, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 97 (8/28/02).

57-3-102. Traffic in intoxicating liquor permitted by local option.

It is lawful to manufacture, store, sell, distribute and purchase alcoholic beverages or wine subject to proper licensing, payment of taxes, compliance with the limitation, regulations and conditions provided in this chapter, in counties or municipalities of this state that by local option elections so permit as provided in this chapter.

It shall be lawful for an individual to transport up to five gallons (5 gals.) of alcoholic beverages or wine for personal or household use of the individual in counties or municipalities that have not permitted the sale of alcoholic beverages or wine by local option elections as provided in this chapter and amounts in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) if accompanied by a receipt or other documentation demonstrating legal purchase or transport from an entity licensed under § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207 or § 57-3-218.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.5 (Williams, § 6648.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-107; Acts 2009, ch. 434, § 3; 2011, ch. 451, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 4, 14, 15.

57-3-103. Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect chapter 2 of this title.

Alcoholic beverages lawfully manufactured pursuant to chapter 2 of this title may be lawfully sold in Tennessee by a manufacturer to a wholesaler duly licensed, in those counties or municipalities which favor local option after election duly held and carried as hereinafter provided for. Any manufacturer now operating pursuant to chapter 2 of this title may continue to do so without being affected in any way by this chapter, except as otherwise expressly provided herein.

Except as specifically permitted in §§ 57-3-207, 57-3-402 and 57-3-403, no person may store any alcoholic beverages, unless the person holds a license under § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-218 or § 57-4-101, or is employed by the licensee, unless the alcoholic beverage is intended for that person's personal or social use.

It is the intent of the general assembly to be certain that any product containing or manufactured with distilled alcohol should be distributed only in those jurisdictions authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages, and such distribution be subject to the rules and regulations of the commission.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.6 (Williams, § 6648.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-108; Acts 1983, ch. 229, § 5; 1986, ch. 516, §§ 2, 3; 2006, ch. 955, § 1; 2011, ch. 451, § 5; 2014, ch. 554, § 20.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 861, § 4 purported to amend subdivision (a)(1). Subdivision (a)(1) was previously rewritten by Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 20; therefore the amendment by Acts 2014, ch. 861, § 4 was not given effect by authority of the code commission.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to foodstuff products, OAG 90-31, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (3/7/90).

Hard cider, OAG 94-75, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (7/8/94).

57-3-104. Enforcement and administration by commission — Licensing procedures.

The commission shall have the authority, by and with the consent of the governor, to employ such attorneys, inspectors, agents, officers and clerical assistance as may be necessary for the effective administration and enforcement of this chapter. The compensation of such personnel shall be approved by the governor.

The commission shall enforce and administer this chapter and the rules and regulations made by it.

The commission shall have and exercise the following functions, duties and powers:

Issue all licenses in respect to, or for the manufacture, importation, bottling, keeping, giving away, furnishing, possession, transportation, sale, and delivery of alcoholic beverages, and to revoke any license whatsoever, the issuance of which is authorized by this chapter;

Any revocation of any license shall be made by the commission only on account of the violation of, or refusal to comply with, any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission, after not less than ten (10) days' notice to the holder of the license proposed to be revoked, informing such licensee of the time and place of the hearing to be held in respect thereto, and all further procedure with reference to the revocation of any license shall be fixed and prescribed in the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission, which may be repealed or amended from time to time;

No person has a property right in any license issued hereunder, nor shall the license itself, or the enjoyment thereof, be considered a property right;

The commission shall hold a hearing to determine whether such license shall be revoked, which hearing shall be held with the same notice and in the same manner as all other hearings provided for under this chapter, whenever:

Any county mayor, if a license has been issued outside the corporate limits of the municipality and outside a civil district meeting the requirements set out in § 57-3-205;

A majority of a three-member commission which has been set up as provided in § 57-3-108, if a license has been issued within a civil district meeting the requirements set out in § 57-3-205; or

The mayor or majority of the commission, city council or legislative council of a municipality within which a license has been issued

certifies that any licensee has habitually violated this chapter, or any regulation adopted by the county legislative bodies, three-member commissions, or legislative councils, relative to the conduct and operation of the business provided for in this chapter;

Refuse to issue a license or permit if, upon investigation, the commission finds that the applicant for a license or permit has concealed or misrepresented in writing or otherwise any material fact or circumstance concerning the operation of the business or employment, or if the interest of the applicant in the operation of the business or employment is not truly stated in the application, or in case of any fraud or false swearing by the applicant touching any matter relating to the operation of the business or employment. If a license or permit has been issued, the commission shall issue a citation to the licensee or permittee to show cause why the license or permit should not be suspended or revoked. All data, written statements, affidavits, evidence or other documents submitted in support of an application are a part of the application;

Summon any applicant for a license or permit and also to summon and examine witnesses, and to administer oaths to such applicants and witnesses in making any investigation in regard thereto;

Make, promulgate, alter, amend, or repeal rules and regulations for the enforcement of this chapter or the collections of all license fees and taxes, and all penalties and forfeitures relating thereto, except that the alcoholic beverage tax authorized to be collected by §§ 57-3-302 and 57-3-303 shall be collected by the commissioner of revenue;

Prescribe all forms of application and licenses and tax stamps, and of all reports and all other papers and documents required to be used under or in the enforcement of this chapter, except that the alcoholic beverage tax authorized to be collected by §§ 57-3-302 and 57-3-303 shall be collected by the commissioner of revenue;

Prevent parts of the premises connected with or in any sense used in connection with the premises, whereon the possession, transportation, delivery, receipt, sale or purchase of alcoholic beverages may be lawful, from being used as a subterfuge, or means of evading the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission;

Conform to, adopt, or coordinate, to the extent that the commission may deem proper, the practices, methods, standards, rules, and regulations governing traffic in alcoholic beverages, and in alcohol, with the rules, practices, standards, and regulations established by the government of the United States, or any officer, bureau or agency thereof;

Require, on licensed premises, the destruction or removal of any and all bottles, whether empty or otherwise, cases, containers, apparatus, or devices, used or likely to be used, designed or intended or employed in evading, violating or preventing the enforcement of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission;

Regulate the advertising, signs and displays, posters or designs intended to advertise any alcoholic beverage or the place where the same is sold; and

Refuse to issue or renew a license or permit, or issue a citation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per violation if, upon investigation, the commission finds that the applicant for a license or permit has not demonstrated the financial capacity to operate the business in a manner consistent with the regulations of the commission or is not generally paying its debts as they come due except for debts as to which there is a bona fide dispute.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 4; 1945, ch. 167, § 1; 1947, ch. 73, § 2; 1949, ch. 284, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.7; Acts 1951, ch. 52, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, §§ 11, 33; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-109; Acts 1981, ch. 474, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2014, ch. 1015, § 6; 2017, ch. 147, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2 directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 3, 4, 6-9, 15, 28.

Law Reviews.

Delegation of Powers to Administrative Agencies in Tennessee (Philip P. Durand), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 569.

Attorney General Opinions. The Alcoholic Beverage Commission (ABC) has the power, by necessary implication, to require distillers of alcoholic beverages to report the names of the current corporate shareholders and officers on a form designated by the ABC. For purposes of reporting to the ABC a change in the stock ownership of a corporation that operates a distillery, there is no provision of law that expressly establishes a threshold percentage change of interest that must be met before the change is required to be reported. Likewise, no provision of current state law exempts any type of distillery from reporting the names of corporate shareholders and officers to the ABC. OAG 18-03, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/31/2018).

57-3-105. Conflicts of interest prohibited.

No member of the commission and no person employed by the commission shall have any interest, direct or indirect, either proprietary or by means of any loan, mortgage or lien, or in any other manner, in or on any premises where alcoholic beverages are sold; nor shall they or any of them have any interest, direct or indirect, in any business wholly or partially devoted to the sale, transportation or storage of alcoholic beverages.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.16 (Williams, § 6648.8); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-110.